Washington statutes.
RCW 43.88.175

Credit reporting agencies—State agency use.

State agencies may report receivables to credit reporting agencies whenever the agency determines that such reporting would be cost-effective and does not violate confidentiality or other legal requirements. Within thirty-five days after satisfaction of a debt reported to a credit reporting agency, the state agency reporting the debt shall notify the credit reporting agency that the debt has been satisfied.

[ 1991 c 85 s 1; 1989 c 100 s 1.]